Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2859.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-54 of the General Laws entitled "Physician Assistants" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-54-29. Physician assistant -- Behavioral health license.
(a) Creation of license. There is hereby established a specialty license designation known
as "physician assistant - behavioral health" for physician assistants practicing in the field of
psychiatry or mental health.
(b) Eligibility. An applicant for licensure as a physician assistant - behavioral health shall:
(1) Hold a current and active license as a physician assistant in the State of Rhode Island
pursuant to this chapter; and
(2) Hold a current certificate of added qualifications ("CAQ") in psychiatry issued by the
national commission on certification of physician assistants ("NCCPA").
(c) Criteria. The requirements for issuance and maintenance of the physician assistant –
behavioral health license shall be satisfied upon proof that the applicant has met and continues to
meet all criteria established by the NCCPA for the psychiatry CAQ including, but not limited to:
(1) Possession of a current PA-C designation;
(2) Completion of required continuing medical education credits in psychiatry;
(3) Completion of required clinical experience hours in psychiatry practice;
(4) Attestation of competency by a collaborating or supervising physician in psychiatry;
and

(5) Successful passage of the NCCPA psychiatry specialty examination.
(d) Application and renewal. The department of health shall promulgate rules and
regulations governing the application, renewal, and documentation requirements for the physician
assistant - behavioral health license. Renewal of this specialty license shall require continued
maintenance of the psychiatry CAQ through the NCCPA.
(e) Scope of practice. A physician assistant - behavioral health shall practice in accordance
with the collaborative practice provisions of this chapter and applicable regulations. This specialty
license shall not expand the scope of practice otherwise authorized under Rhode Island law but
shall recognize advanced qualifications in psychiatry and mental health.
(f) Designation. A physician assistant issued a license pursuant to this section may use the
title "physician assistant - behavioral health" or "PA-BH" in this state.
(g) Purpose. The specialty license created by this section is intended to formally recognize
advanced psychiatric qualifications of physician assistants and to facilitate appropriate insurance
reimbursement for behavioral health services provided within their lawful scope of practice
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005400
========
LC005400 - Page 2 of 3